Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-120
University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources; model farm; alienation prohibited.

State land set aside by the Governor for a model farm as a part of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall not be disposed of for any other purpose.

Laws 1869, § 10, p. 175;

R.S.1913, § 7088;

C.S.1922, § 6720;

C.S.1929, § 85-108;

R.S.1943, § 85-120;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 61.